Alabama, session 2026rs, HB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
59 Section 1. In addition to all other appropriations
60 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated a
61 total of $419,717,091 from the Education Trust Fund to the
62 following agencies and entities for the purposes specified
63 below for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026:
64 (1) To the State Board of Education – Local Boards of
65 Education for fleet renewal, $25,000,000. This appropriation
66 shall be distributed according to the fleet renewal guidelines
67 to be used for the purchase of school buses or the retirement
68 of school bus debt. For any school system that is currently up
69 to date in purchasing regular route buses, application may be
70 made to the State Superintendent of Education to flex these
71 funds for other educational purposes.
72 (2) To the State Department of Education for one-time
73 expenses, $143,245,000. Of this amount, $25,000,000 shall be
74 for School Safety to provide additional training, services,
75 supplies, and materials to support school safety initiatives
76 and safety contracts to be allocated pursuant to Chapter 22B,
77 Title 16, Code of Alabama 1975, including $3,000,000 for
78 school mapping; $20,000,000 shall be used for College and
79 Career Readiness Grants; $10,000,000 shall be used for Charter
80 School Grants which shall be distributed to the several
81 existing conversion and start-up charter schools on a per
82 pupil basis; $30,000,000 shall be used for the Summer and
83 Afterschool Program; $10,000,000 shall be used for Career Tech
84 equipment, of which $1,500,000 shall be used to purchase
Page 3

equipment, of which $1,500,000 shall be used to purchase
HB235 Enrolled
85 simulators for the pilot of heavy equipment operator training
86 programs to be implemented in a sample of high schools across
87 the state for which distribution shall be planned and
88 implemented in partnership with the Alabama Road Builders
89 Association to maximize the number of programs and to ensure
90 the program reflects workforce needs; $8,750,000 shall be used
91 for the McWane Center; $4,000,000 shall be used for the North
92 Alabama STEM Center; $1,000,000 shall be used for The Links
93 for parental education, financial education for families,
94 teaching good hygiene to children, and the food pantry;
95 $10,000,000 shall be used for EdFarm to develop new and
96 advanced technologies and programs, deploy broadband internet
97 infrastructure in rural communities, and support online
98 education training programs, certifications, and job placement
99 assistance in technology fields. The Superintendent shall
100 expend these funds to expand digital literacy, create jobs in
101 technology fields, reinvigorate career and technical education
102 opportunities, and attract business to rural Alabama;
103 $7,300,000 shall be used for the School Breakfast Program;
104 $1,100,000 shall be used for the CREATE Technology and
105 Innovation Center; $750,000 shall be used for the Woolley
106 Institute for Spoken Language Education; $720,000 shall be
107 used for the Back the Blue Foundation school detection dog
108 program; $400,000 shall be used for the Summer Cyber Academy
109 for high school students operated by Talladega College;
110 $200,000 shall be used for the Dundrill Heights and Just Be
111 Real film camps for Birmingham City School students; $200,000
112 shall be used for the Alabama Holocaust Commission for teacher
Page 4

shall be used for the Alabama Holocaust Commission for teacher
HB235 Enrolled
113 training; $100,000 shall be used for the Jazz Hall of Fame
114 statewide students program; $950,000 shall be used for the
115 EarlyWorks Museum; $850,000 shall be used for the Heman
116 Drummond Center for Innovation; $200,000 shall be used for the
117 ATTA STEM Learning Ecosystem; $225,000 shall be used for the
118 Mays Educational Center in Fairfield; $100,000 shall be used
119 for Oak Tree Ministries - Newton Center; $150,000 shall be
120 used for the Jones Valley Teaching Farm; $1,250,000 to Junior
121 Achievement of Alabama for capital expenditures related to a
122 location in the Huntsville/Madison community area, said funds
123 are contingent upon committed matching funds from private
124 and/or public funds of not less than $3,000,000, said match is
125 to be certified to the Director of Finance as committed by
126 Junior Achievement of Alabama no later than August 31, 2026,
127 and if no certification is received, then the funds shall
128 revert to the Education Trust Fund; and $10,000,000 shall be
129 used for Struggling Readers Beyond Grade 3 to support middle
130 grade reading improvements with the Superintendent requested
131 to consider reading assistance for the following Mobile County
132 Public Schools: Chastang, Fonde, ER Dickson, Indian Springs,
133 John Will, Meadowlake, Morningside, Orchard, and Whitley.
134 (3) To the Alabama Public Library Service for one-time
135 expenses for the Cullman County Public Library to build an
136 addition to house an education facility with an IT focus,
137 $500,000.
138 (4) To the Alabama School of Cyber Technology and
139 Engineering for one-time expenses for deferred maintenance,
140 general capital expenses, and school safety, $2,500,000.
Page 5

general capital expenses, and school safety, $2,500,000.
HB235 Enrolled
141 (5) To the Alabama School of Fine Arts for one-time
142 expenses for deferred maintenance, general capital expenses,
143 and school safety, $2,500,000.
144 (6) To the Marine Environmental Sciences Consortium for
145 one-time capital expenses for the Dauphin Island Sea Lab,
146 $2,000,000.
147 (7) To the Alabama School of Mathematics and Science
148 for one-time expenses for deferred maintenance, general
149 capital expenses, and school safety, $2,500,000.
150 (8) To the Alabama School of Healthcare Sciences for
151 one-time expenses for school safety and general capital
152 expenses, $1,000,000.
153 (9) To the Department of Rehabilitation Services,
154 $7,961,087. Of this amount, $5,461,087 shall be used for
155 one-time expenses for vocational rehabilitation and workforce
156 development; $2,000,000 shall be used for the Kulture City
157 disability workforce center; $300,000 shall be used for United
158 Ability; and $200,000 shall be used for United Cerebral Palsy
159 - Huntsville.
160 (10) To the Department of Public Health, $12,650,000.
161 Of this amount, $10,000,000 shall be used for the CHIP
162 Program; $850,000 shall be used for pregnancy resource
163 centers; $800,000 shall be used for the Cahaba Medical Clinic
164 - Rural Psychiatry Residencies; and $1,000,000 shall be used
165 for the Regional Training Institute.
166 (11) To the Alabama Community College System for
167 one-time expenses, $27,201,249. Of this amount, $13,426,249
168 shall be used for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
Page 6

shall be used for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
HB235 Enrolled
169 facilities, or expenses associated with ongoing capital
170 projects; $5,000,000 shall be used for Wallace State Community
171 College (Hanceville) for capital projects; $75,000 shall be
172 used for Trenholm State Community College; $1,800,000 shall be
173 used for the Lauderdale County Agplex for veterinary
174 diagnostic equipment and supplies; $1,900,000 shall be used
175 for the Calhoun Community College Culinary Center; $4,000,000
176 shall be used for Drake State Community Technical College for
177 economic development; and $1,000,000 shall be used for the
178 Jefferson State Community College Adult Learning Center in
179 Trussville.
180 (12) To the Alabama Commission on Higher Education for
181 one-time expenses, $8,848,960. Of this amount, $2,000,000
182 shall be used for the USS Alabama Battleship to support
183 construction, maintenance, or operational costs of educational
184 facilities; $400,000 shall be used for the North Alabama
185 Agriplex for the expansion of children’s educational programs
186 and capital projects; $2,000,000 shall be used for the Alabama
187 Veterinary Hospital - Birmingham Zoo; $1,250,992 shall be used
188 for Tuskegee University for one-time expenses for deferred
189 maintenance, renovation of existing facilities, school
190 security, or expenses associated with ongoing capital
191 projects; $1,500,000 shall be used for Tuskegee University for
192 one-time capital expenses for the Kellog Conference Center;
193 $62,968 shall be used for Talladega College for one-time
194 expenses for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
195 facilities, school security, or expenses associated with
196 ongoing capital projects; $250,000 shall be used for the North
Page 7

ongoing capital projects; $250,000 shall be used for the North
HB235 Enrolled
197 Alabama Land Trust; $1,000,000 shall be used for Sweet Trails;
198 $200,000 shall be used for Selma University; and $185,000
199 shall be used for the Tennessee RiverLine Program.
200 (13) To the Department of Workforce for one-time
201 expenses, $6,900,000. Of this amount, $3,500,000 shall be used
202 for IT system upgrades and a disaster recovery and backup
203 plan; $500,000 shall be used for a marketing campaign to
204 connect with rural/hard to reach workers; $2,000,000 shall be
205 used for the Forest Worker Training Institute; $400,000 shall
206 be used for the Alabama Advanced Transportation Readiness
207 Initiative; and $500,000 shall be used for data information
208 and retention.
209 (14) To the Alabama Innovation Fund, $2,000,000 for
210 one-time expenses for Hudson Alpha to support the HOPE-AD
211 initiative, a statewide effort to advance Alzheimer's
212 prevention research directly serving Alabamians through
213 education, clinical innovation, community engagement and
214 workforce development. The program will uncover new insights
215 for how Alzheimer's develops and use those findings to improve
216 how prevention is taught, how care is delivered, and how
217 families manage their brain health in Alabama. Thousands of
218 Alabama residents may volunteer to be screened to learn their
219 risk factors and receive personalized prevention guidance.
220 These discoveries will shape clinical practice, educate
221 Alabamians, strengthen and develop Alabama's biomedical
222 workforce, and further position the state as a national leader
223 to attract investment in healthcare research and prevention.
224 (15) To the Educational Television Commission,
Page 8

(15) To the Educational Television Commission,
HB235 Enrolled
225 $2,150,000. Of this amount, $2,000,000 shall be used as the
226 final appropriation for one-time expenses to equip and support
227 the build-out of the APT studio in the new state house; and
228 $150,000 shall be used for semiquincentennial programming.
229 (16) To Alabama A&M University for one-time expenses
230 for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing facilities,
231 or expenses associated with ongoing capital projects,
232 $8,401,824.
233 (17) To Alabama State University for one-time expenses
234 for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing facilities,
235 or expenses associated with ongoing capital projects,
236 $4,360,182.
237 (18) To the University of Alabama System, $44,169,369.
238 Of this amount, $36,169,369 shall be used for one-time
239 expenses for increasing research capacity, deferred
240 maintenance, renovation of existing facilities, or ongoing
241 capital projects; $7,500,000 shall be used for the University
242 of Alabama Public Policy Center; and $500,000 shall be used
243 for the University of Alabama in Huntsville CubeSat Program.
244 (19) To Athens State University, $1,615,927. Of this
245 amount, $1,115,927 shall be used for one-time expenses for
246 deferred maintenance, renovation of existing facilities, or
247 expenses associated with ongoing capital projects; and
248 $500,000 shall be used for the Art and Music Library.
249 (20) To Auburn University, $20,406,603. Of this amount,
250 $19,906,603 shall be used for one-time expenses for increasing
251 research infrastructure and instrumentation, technology
252 systems, deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
Page 9

systems, deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
HB235 Enrolled
253 facilities, ongoing capital projects, or presidential
254 initiatives; and $500,000 shall be used for the Artemis
255 Research Innovation Campus in Huntsville.
256 (21) To Auburn University at Montgomery for one-time
257 expenses for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
258 facilities, or expenses associated with ongoing capital
259 projects, $1,661,328.
260 (22) To Jacksonville State University, $4,440,678. Of
261 this amount, $3,490,678 shall be used for one-time expenses
262 for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing facilities,
263 or expenses associated with ongoing capital projects; $450,000
264 shall be used for a Rose Bowl trip for the marching band; and
265 $500,000 shall be used for the Randy Owens Center for the
266 Performing Arts.
267 (23) To the University of Montevallo for one-time
268 expenses for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
269 facilities, or expenses associated with ongoing capital
270 projects, $2,967,772.
271 (24) To the University of North Alabama for one-time
272 expenses for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
273 facilities, or expenses associated with ongoing capital
274 projects, $4,538,046.
275 (25) To the University of South Alabama, $9,579,249. Of
276 the above appropriation, $9,379,249 shall be used for one-time
277 expenses for increasing research capacity, deferred
278 maintenance, renovation of existing facilities, or ongoing
279 capital projects; and $200,000 shall be used for a study of
280 the environmental and economic impact of dredging in Mobile
Page 10

the environmental and economic impact of dredging in Mobile
HB235 Enrolled
281 Bay.
282 (26) To Troy University, $5,175,081. Of this amount,
283 $4,175,081 shall be used for one-time expenses for deferred
284 maintenance, renovation of existing facilities, or expenses
285 associated with ongoing capital projects; and $1,000,000 shall
286 be used for the Chiropractic Program.
287 (27) To the University of West Alabama for one-time
288 expenses for deferred maintenance, renovation of existing
289 facilities, or expenses associated with ongoing capital
290 projects, $2,974,736.
291 (28) To the Department of Agriculture and Industries,
292 $500,000. Of this amount, $300,000 shall be used for the
293 Blount County Multipurpose Agricultural Center; and $200,000
294 shall be used for the Landmark Park Foundation.
295 (29) To the Council on the Arts, $375,000. Of this
296 amount, $125,000 shall be used for the Alabama Symphony
297 Orchestra; and $250,000 shall be used for the Bare Hands
298 Community Center.
299 (30) To the Executive Commission on Community Services
300 Grants to be distributed pursuant to Section 29-2-123, Code of
301 Alabama 1975, $10,000,000.
302 (31) To the Alabama Historical Commission, $6,785,000.
303 Of this amount, $1,000,000 shall be used for the Daniel Pratt
304 Museum; $1,750,000 shall be used for the Historic Blakely
305 Park; $125,000 shall be used for Gees Bend Quilting Bee
306 Cultural Preservation Center; $1,750,000 shall be used for the
307 Scottsboro Boys Historical Initiative to be divided equally
308 among the Scottsboro Boys Museum and Judge Horton Civil
Page 11

among the Scottsboro Boys Museum and Judge Horton Civil
HB235 Enrolled
309 Justice Learning Center; $600,000 shall be used for Brierfield
310 Ironworks Historic State Park; $75,000 shall be used for the
311 Somerville Courthouse; $75,000 shall be used for the USCT
312 Monument; $75,000 shall be used for the Cahaba Homestead
313 Heritage Foundation; $50,000 shall be used for the Vaughn
314 Smitherman Museum; $75,000 shall be used for the Jesse Owens
315 Memorial; $235,000 shall be used for the Helen Keller
316 Foundation; $100,000 shall be used for the Limestone County
317 Veterans Museum; and $875,000 shall be used for renovations to
318 the Looney's Amphitheater Complex and Cultural Center stage.
319 (32) To the Legislative Council for construction and
320 related expenses for the new State House, $37,500,000.
321 (33) To the U.S. Space and Rocket Center Commission,
322 $3,500,000.
323 (34) To the Firefighters' Personnel Standards and
324 Education Commission/Fire College, $1,025,000. Of this amount,
325 $500,000 shall be used for one-time expenses for deferred
326 maintenance, renovation of existing facilities, or expenses
327 associated with ongoing capital projects; and $525,000 shall
328 be used for the Winfield Fire Service EMT Program.
329 (35) To the Geological Survey, $300,000.
330 (36) To the Department of Human Resources, $1,985,000.
331 Of this amount, $135,000 shall be used for Beacon House;
332 $250,000 shall be used for the North Alabama Boys and Girls
333 Club; $100,000 shall be used for Mitchell's Place; and
334 $1,500,000 shall be used for Kids to Love.
335 (37) To the Alabama Institute for the Deaf and Blind
336 for perimeter fencing and other capital projects, $500,000.
Page 12

for perimeter fencing and other capital projects, $500,000.
HB235 Enrolled
337 Section 2. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
338 2026, up to $49,920 shall be transferred from the Alabama
339 Student Assistance Program Fund to the Commission on Higher
340 Education Fund.
341 Section 3. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
342 2026, up to $148,192 shall be transferred from the Knight
343 Court Monitor Fund to the Commission on Higher Education Fund.
344 Section 4. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
345 2026, up to $114,723 shall be transferred from the Teacher
346 Education Scholarship Loan Fund to the Commission on Higher
347 Education Fund.
348 Section 5. In addition to all other appropriations
349 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
350 $312,835 from the Commission on Higher Education Fund to the
351 Commission on Higher Education. Of this amount, $198,112 shall
352 be used for operating expenses of the Commission, and $114,723
353 shall be used for the AKEEP Education and Teacher Recruitment
354 Program.
355 Section 6. In addition to all other appropriations
356 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated a
357 total of $100,000,000 from the CHOOSE Act Fund to the
358 Department of Revenue for the fiscal year ending September 30,
359 2026.
360 Section 7. In addition to other authorized uses,
361 conversion charter schools receiving grant funds under Act
362 2024-428 shall be allowed to use the funds as needed.
363 Section 8. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
364 2026, the Alabama Historical Commission shall be allowed to
Page 13

2026, the Alabama Historical Commission shall be allowed to
HB235 Enrolled
365 use any returned or unused funds previously appropriated from
366 the Education Trust Fund for historical grants to provide
367 additional historical grants notwithstanding any maximum grant
368 or eligibility restrictions for grants in the fiscal year
369 ending September 30, 2026.
370 Section 9. Section 3B of Act 2025-270, the Education
371 Appropriations Act for the fiscal year ending September 30,
372 2026, is hereby amended as follows:
373 "26. Health, Department of Public:
374 (a) Alabama Medical
375 Education Consortium 1,110,000 1,110,000
376 (1) Rural Alabama
377 Teaching Health 1,110,000
378 Center 385,000
379 (2) Decatur Morgan
380 Graduate Medical
381 Education Program 725,000
382
383 Section 10. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
384 this act or any other act, any amounts from appropriations for
385 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, to the various
386 state agencies in this act which were unexpended and reverted
387 on September 30, 2026, are hereby reappropriated to the
388 respective offices for the fiscal year beginning October 1,
389 2026.
390 Section 11. In addition to all appropriations
391 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
392 such amounts as may be necessary for public funds transferred
Page 14

such amounts as may be necessary for public funds transferred
HB235 Enrolled
393 into the State Treasury, in accordance with Executive Order
394 No. 726.
395 Section 12. This act shall become effective immediately
396 upon its passage and approval by the Governor, or upon its
397 otherwise becoming law.
Page 15

otherwise becoming law.
HB235 Enrolled
398
399
400
401
402
403
404
405
406
407
408 ________________________________________________
409 Speaker of the House of Representatives
410
411
412
413 ________________________________________________
414 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
415
416
417 House of Representatives
418
419 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
420 was passed by the House 12-Mar-26.
421
422 John Treadwell
423 Clerk
424
425
426
427
428
429 Senate 02-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
430
431 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
432 Amendment
433
434
Page 16